test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ooumazh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ooumaž a-stem man: # Noun - full paradigm
     ooumaž+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ooumaž
     ooumaž+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: oummu
     ooumaž+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: oummu
     ooumaž+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: ooumže
     ooumaž+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: oummust
     ooumaž+N+Sg+Com+Indef: oummuin
     ooumaž+N+Ess+Indef: ooumažen
     ooumaž+N+Par+Indef: ooumažed
     ooumaž+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [oummuʼtaa, oummuʼtää]
     ooumaž+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: oummu
     ooumaž+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: oummui
     ooumaž+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: oummuid
     ooumaž+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: oummuid
     ooumaž+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: oummuin
     ooumaž+N+Pl+Com+Indef: oummuivuiʹm
     ooumaž+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [oummuitaa, oummuitää]
